Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Public/Private Partnerships Program

4-37-201. Creation — Use of matching funds — Departmental report — Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The department of human services is authorized to work with local communities, industry and other entities to develop the preliminary parameters of a program of public/private partnerships to enhance funding of child care. In such efforts, the department shall involve entities such as the Tennessee Child Care Facilities and Programs Corporation, established pursuant to part 1 of this chapter [repealed], the appropriate local families first councils and the work force development council.

In exploring such partnerships, the department shall examine the feasibility of securing federal and state funding as an incentive for developing matching local funds derived from local governments, employers, charitable institutions or foundations and other sources, so that communities may seek local, flexible partnerships with employers for the creation and enhancement of child care.

Only to the extent of any current funding not otherwise obligated by law, the department may also establish preliminary public/private partnerships through a program based upon the principles in subsection (a). In any preliminary program created pursuant to this subsection (b), any matching funds shall be used with the input and direction of local communities to meet the needs of working parents and to create, expand or upgrade on-site child care facilities; to contract or partner with child care agencies that provide such types of child care as sick-care, after-hours care for children and any other forms of child care that become necessary to meet the needs of children, parents, and employers; and to use such funds as incentives or for studies that may be necessary to aid in the development of any child care for the particular community.

Any funds used pursuant to this subsection (b) shall supplement or extend the use of existing public or private funding and shall not be used to supplant the maintenance of effort being exerted currently by the employer or other contributor.

Any funds utilized pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be for child care provided in a facility licensed, approved or certified by a state child care licensing, certification or approval entity under title 37, 49, or 71, or in any other facility or program approved for the care of children by the department.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations, which may include emergency rules, pursuant to chapter 5 of this title, to implement subsection (b). Such rules may include criteria for grants and use of program funds and shall be limited to any currently available funds not otherwise obligated by law.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 80; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-37-201(c), concerning a report to the house of representatives and senate committees, was deemed obsolete by the code commission in 2005.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Former title 4, chapter 37, part 1, referred to in this section, concerning the Tennessee child care facilities corporation, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 80, § 2, effective April 27, 2009.